Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,121
Division of Rehabilitation Services; established.

The Division of Rehabilitation Services in the State Department of Education is established.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 1, p. 1001;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1446;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 903.